arb-verbs.xfst
clear stack
set char-encoding UTF-8
!read regex < arb-TestWord.txt
!define TestWord
source arb-Alphabet.txt
define Alphabet
define PossVerbStem [[Alphabet]^{2,6}] "+Guess":0;
source arb-VerbAssim1.txt
define VerbAssim1
source arb-VerbAssim2.txt
define VerbAssim2
source arb-VerbAssim3.txt
define VerbAssim3
define VerbAssim VerbAssim1 .o. VerbAssim2 .o. VerbAssim3;
define cl1 [? -> 0 || "^orig" _ "^orig",,
? -> 0 || "^dbl" _ "^dbl"
];

define clIntermedLang [
"^ss^" -> [] ,
"^se^" -> [] ,
"+fem" -> [],
"+masc" -> [],
"+imp" -> [],
"+pres" -> [],
"+pass" -> [],
"+past" -> [],
"^orig" -> [],
"^dbl" -> [],
"^comprep^" -> [],
"+1pers" -> [] ,
"+2pers" -> [] ,
[1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] -> [] ,
"+3pers" -> [] ];

echo ">>> compile lexc"
read lexc < arb-verbs-lexc.txt
echo ">>> eliminate flags"
eliminate flag T
! eliminate flag V
eliminate flag M
eliminate flag PERS
eliminate flag CASE
eliminate flag TRANS
eliminate flag SENSE
eliminate flag CONJ
echo ">>> substitute defined"
substitute defined PossVerbStem for "^GUESSVERBSTEM^"
define AllInclusive
echo ">>> create attested"
read regex ~$["+Guess"] .o. AllInclusive .o. VerbAssim  .o. cl1 .o. clIntermedLang;
!read regex ~$["+Guess"] .o. AllInclusive .o. VerbAssim  .o. TestWord .o. cl1 .o. clIntermedLang;
!compile-replace lower
!save stack arbf-VerbAttested.fst
define ArbVerbs
echo ">>> create guesser"
read regex $["+Guess"] .o. AllInclusive .o. VerbAssim .o. cl1 .o. clIntermedLang;
!save stack arbf-VerbGuesser.fst
define ArbVerbsG
clear stack
